Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3618
Interstate commission; enforcement powers; initiate legal action; remedies available.

(a) The interstate commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact.

(b) The interstate commission may, by majority vote of the commissioners, initiate legal action in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia, or, at the discretion of the interstate commission, in the federal district where the interstate commission has its principal offices, to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact, and its promulgated rules and bylaws, against a member state in default. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation including reasonable attorney’s fees.

(c) The remedies in the compact shall not be the exclusive remedies of the interstate commission. The interstate commission may avail itself of any other remedies available under state law or the regulation of a profession.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 18.